Maryland, session 2025, SB0136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0136*

SENATE BILL 136
7–1501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Fund” means the Safe Schools Fund.
7–1508.
(g) (1) For fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $10,000,000 to the Fund for the
purpose of providing grants to local school systems and local law enforcement agencies to
assist in meeting the requirements of subsection (e) of this section.
(2) Grants provided under this subsection [shall]:
(I) SHALL be made to each local school system based on the number
of schools in each school system in proportion to the total number of public schools in the
State in the prior year; AND
(II) MAY BE REALLOCATED TO LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS THAT
HAVE FULLY EXPENDED THEIR ALLOCATION AND DEMONSTRATE NEED WITHIN THE
SAME FISCAL YEAR.
(3) TWICE ANNUALLY, THE SUBCABINET SHALL NOTIFY EACH LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM REGARDING THE STATUS OF THE ALLOCATIONS MADE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.